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DTC P0505/33 Idle Control System Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The rotary solenoid type ISC valve is located in front of the in-
take air chamber and intake air bypassing the throttle valve is
directed to the ISC valve through a passage.
In thisway the intakeair volumebypassing the throttlevalve is
regulated, controlling the engine speed.
TheengineECUoperatesonly the ISCvalve toperform idle −up
and provide feedback for the target idling speed.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

SOpenorshort in ISCvalvecircuit

P0505/33 Openorshort in ISCvalvecircuit.

SOpen orshort in ISC valve circuit
S ISCvalveP0505/33 Open orshort in ISC valve circuit. ISC valve
SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time of the malfunction.

When using hand−held tester

1 Check engine idle speed.

PREPARATION:
(a) Warm up engine to normal operating temperature.
(b) Switch off all accessories.
(c) Switch off air conditioning.
(d) Shift transmission into ”N” or neutral position.
(e) Connect hand−held tester to DLC3 on the vehicle.
(f) Using SST, connect terminals 13 (TC) and 4 (CG) of the

DLC3.
SST 09843−18040

CHECK:
Check the difference of engine speed between the ones less
than 5 sec. and more than 5 sec. after connecting terminals 13
(TC) and 4 (CG) of the DLC3.
OK:

Differenceofenginespeed:More than 100rpm

OK Proceed to next circuit inspection shown on
problem symptom table (See page DI−21).
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2 Check voltage between terminal RSD of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E13 connector of engine ECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measurevoltagebetween terminalRSDofengineECUcon-
nector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage:9 − 14 V

OK Go to step 5.

NG

3 Check voltage between terminal of ISC valve connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the ISC valve connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal 2 of ISC valve connector
and body ground.
OK:

Voltage:9 − 14 V

NG Check for open and short in harness and con-
nector between ISC valve and engine room J/B.

OK
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4 Check for open and short in harness and connector in RSD circuit.

NG Repair or replace.

OK

Replace ISC valve.

5 Check for open and short in harness and connector between terminal 3 of ISC
valve connector and body ground.

NG Repair or replace.

OK

6 Check operation of the ISC valve (See page FI−42).

NG Replace ISC valve.

OK

7 Check the blockage of ISC valve and the passage to bypass the throttle valve.

NG Repair or replace ISC valve and throttle body.

OK

Proceed to next circuit inspection shown on
problem symptom table (See page DI−21).
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When not using hand−held tester

1 Check voltage between terminal RSD of engine ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E13 connector of engine ECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal RSD of engine ECU con-
nector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 9 − 14 V

OK Go to step 4.

NG

2 Check voltage between terminal of ISC valve connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the ISC valve connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal 2 of ISC valve connector
and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 9 − 14 V

NG Check for open and short in harness and con-
nector between ISC valve and engine room J/B.

OK
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3 Check for open and short in harness and connector in RSD circuit.

NG Repair or replace.

OK

Replace ISC valve.

4 Check for open and short in harness and connector between terminal 3 of ISC
valve connector and body ground.

NG Repair or replace.

OK

5 Check operation of the ISC valve (See page FI−42).

NG Replace ISC valve.

OK

6 Check the blockage of ISC valve and the passage to bypass the throttle valve.

NG Repair or replace ISC valve and throttle body.

OK

Proceed to next circuit inspection shown on
problem symptom table (See page DI−21).


